Utah statutes.
58-68-502.   Unprofessional conduct.
"Unprofessional conduct" includes, in addition to the definition in Section
58-1-501, using or employing the services of any individual to assist a
licensee in any manner not in accordance with the generally recognized
practices, standards, or ethics of the profession, state law, or division
rule.
